District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.11

Repealed

Minority Enterprise Small Business Investment Company and Small Business Investment Company.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 12, 31 DCR 2514
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2221.